Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 2 Simultaneous Deaths

33-2-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Simultaneous Death Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-1

.

33-2-2.
Presumption of survivorship as to each decedent.

Where the title to property or the devolution thereof depends upon priority of death and there is no sufficient evidence that the persons have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property of each person shall be disposed of as if he or she had survived, except as provided otherwise in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-2

.

33-2-3.
Successive beneficiaries dying simultaneously.

Where two (2) or more beneficiaries are designated to take successively by reason of survivorship under another person’s disposition of property and there is no sufficient evidence that these beneficiaries have died otherwise than simultaneously the property thus disposed of shall be divided into as many equal portions as there are successive beneficiaries and these portions shall be distributed respectively to those who would have taken in the event that each designated beneficiary had survived.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-3

.

33-2-4.
Joint tenants or tenants by entirety dying simultaneously.

Where there is no sufficient evidence that two (2) joint tenants or tenants by the entirety have died otherwise than simultaneously the property so held shall be distributed one-half (1/2) as if one had survived and one-half (1/2) as if the other had survived. If there are more than two (2) joint tenants and all of them have so died the property thus distributed shall be in the proportion that one bears to the whole number of joint tenants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-4

.

33-2-5.
Insurance policies.

Where the insured and the beneficiary in a policy of life or accident insurance have died, and there is no sufficient evidence that they have died otherwise than simultaneously, the proceeds of the policy shall be distributed as if the insured had survived the beneficiary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-5

.

33-2-6.
Chapter not retroactive.

This chapter shall not apply to the distribution of the property of a person who has died before April 28, 1947.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-6

.

33-2-7.
Chapter inapplicable where other provisions made.

This chapter shall not apply in the case of wills, living trusts, deeds, or contracts of insurance wherein provision has been made for distribution of property different from the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-7

.

33-2-8.
Uniformity of construction.

This chapter shall be so construed and interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-8

.

33-2-9.
Severability.

If any of the provisions of this chapter or the application thereof to any persons or circumstances is held invalid such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1871, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-2-9

.